Utah statutes.
48-2c-904.   Valuation of member's interest in the company.

Except as otherwise provided in the operating agreement, the fair market value of a member's interest in the company at any given time shall be the value at which the interest would change hands in an arms-length transaction between an informed and willing buyer and an informed and willing seller, neither being under any compulsion to buy or to sell, taking into consideration all relevant facts and circumstances, including the provisions of the articles of organization and operating agreement and all relevant discounts or premiums.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session

